Utah statutes.
78A-6-310.   Notice of adjudication hearing.
(1)  Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to Section 78A-6-304, the
petitioner shall cause the petition and notice to be served on:
(a)  the guardian ad litem;
(b)  both parents and any guardian of the child; and
(c)  the child's foster parents.
(2)  The notice shall contain all of the following:
(a)  the name and address of the person to whom the notice is directed;
(b)  the date, time, and place of the hearing on the petition;
(c)  the name of the child on whose behalf the petition has been brought;
(d)  a statement that the parent or guardian to whom notice is given, and the
child, are entitled to have an attorney present at the hearing on the
petition, and that if the parent or guardian is indigent and cannot afford an
attorney, and desires to be represented by an attorney, one will be provided;
and
(e)  a statement that the parent or legal guardian is liable for the cost of
support of the child in the protective custody, temporary custody, and custody
of the division, and for legal counsel appointed for the parent or guardian
under Subsection (2)(d), according to the parent's or guardian's financial
ability.
(3)  Notice and a copy of the petition shall be served on all persons required
to receive notice under Subsection (1) as soon as possible after the petition
is filed and at least five days prior to the time set for the hearing.
